Washington statutes.
RCW 43.386.060

Training.

A state or local government agency using a facial recognition service must conduct periodic training of all individuals who operate a facial recognition service or who process personal data obtained from the use of a facial recognition service. The training must include, but not be limited to, coverage of:

(1) The capabilities and limitations of the facial recognition service;

(2) Procedures to interpret and act on the output of the facial recognition service; and

(3) To the extent applicable to the deployment context, the meaningful human review requirement for decisions that produce legal effects concerning individuals or similarly significant effects concerning individuals.

[ 2020 c 257 s 7.]